Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-1942
Disciplinary action; department;
considerations.

In
determining what type of disciplinary action to impose, the department may
consider:

(1) The gravity
of the violation, including the probability that death or serious physical
or mental harm will result, the severity of the actual or potential harm,
and the extent to which the provisions of applicable statutes, rules, and
regulations were violated;

(2) The reasonableness of the diligence exercised by the licensee
in identifying or correcting the violation;

(3) The degree of cooperation exhibited
by the licensee in the identification, disclosure, and correction of the violation;

(4) Any previous
violations committed by the licensee; and

(5) The financial benefit to the licensee
of committing or continuing the violation.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 19.
May 26, 2013